fi: Huonekalut > Kaapit ja säilytys > Kampauspöydät > Kylpyhuoneen säilytyskalusteet: Kylpyhuoneen kaapit; Kylpyhuonetasosarjat; Nurkkatasot kylpyhuoneeseen; Kaksi allasta; Kelluvat tasot kylpyhuoneeseen; Erilliset tasot kylpyhuoneeseen; Jalustatasot kylpyhuoneeseen; Yhden altaan tasot kylpyhuoneeseen; Päällystämättömät tasot kylpyhuoneeseen; Päällystetyt tasot kylpyhuoneeseen; Kylpyhuonetasojen perustat
lt-LT: Baldai > Spintelės ir sandėliavimas > Kosmetiniai staliukai > Vonios kosmetinės spintelės: Vonios spintelės; Vonios kosmetinių spintelių komplektai; Kampiniai kosmetiniai staliukai; Dvigubos kriauklės; Pakabinami kosmetiniai staliukai; Laisvai stovintys kosmetiniai staliukai; Kosmetiniai staliukai su stovu; Vienos kriauklės kosmetinės spintelės; Kosmetiniai staliukai be stalviršio; Kosmetiniai staliukai su stalviršiu; Kosmetiniai staliukų pagrindai
it: Arredamento > Armadietti e portaoggetti > Componenti di arredo > Componenti di arredo bagno: Armadi da bagno; Set componenti di arredo da bagno; Angolo beauty; Doppi lavandini; Componenti di arredo sospesi; Componenti di arredo da posizionamento libero; Componenti di arredo con piedistallo; Componenti di arredo lavabo singolo; Componenti di arredo senza rivestimento; Componenti di arredo con rivestimento; Componenti di arredo base
nb: Møbler > Skap og lagring > Sminkebord > Sminkebord for bad: Baderomsskap; Sminkebordsett for bad; Hjørnesminkebord; Doble vasker; Flytende sminkebord; Frittstående sminkebord; Sminkebord på pidestall; Sminkebord for enkle vasker; Toppløse sminkebord; Sminkebord med topp; Sminkebordbaser
cs: Nábytek > Skříně a úložné prostory > Toaletní stolky > Koupelnové stolky: Koupelnové skříňky pod umyvadlo; Sady koupelnového nábytku; Rohové skříňky pod umyvadlo; Koupelnové skříňky pod dvojumyvadlo; Závěsné skříňky pod umyvadlo; Volně stojící skříňky pod umyvadlo; Sloupy k umyvadlům; Koupelnové skříňky pod jedno umyvadlo; Koupelnové skříňky bez horní desky; Koupelnové skříňky s horní deskou; Umyvadlové skříňky
fr: Meubles > Armoires et meubles de rangement > Meubles lavabos > Meubles sous vasque: Armoires de salle de bain; Ensembles de meubles de salle de bain; Meubles de salle de bain d’angle; Éviers doubles; Meubles de salle de bain flottants; Meubles de salle de bain autoportants; Meubles de salle de bain sur pied; Meubles de salle de bain à évier simple; Meubles de salle de bain sans surface; Meubles de salle de bain avec surface; Bases de meubles de salle de bain
sv: Möbler > Skåp och lagring > Toalettbord och underskåp > Badrumsunderskåp: Badrumsskåp; Badrumshandfatssatser; Hörnhandfat; Dubbla handfat; Flytande handfat; Fristående handfat; Piedestalhandfat; Enkla handfat; Handfat utan överdel; Handfat med överdel; Handfatsbaser
bg-BG: Мебели > Шкафове и съхранение > Тоалетки и шкафове с мивки > Шкафове за мивки: Шкафове за баня; Комплекти шкафове за баня; Ъглови шкафове с мивки; Двойни мивки; Окачени шкафове с мивки; Шкафове с мивки за под; Пиадестални мивки; Единични шкафове за мивки; Шкафове за мивки без плот; Шкафове за мивки с плот; Основи за шкафове с мивки
th: เฟอร์นิเจอร์ > ตู้และที่จัดเก็บ > โต๊ะเครื่องแป้ง > ตู้ใต้อ่างล้างหน้า: ตู้ห้องน้ำ; ชุดโต๊ะเครื่องแป้งในห้องน้ำ; โต๊ะเครื่องแป้งเข้ามุม; อ่างล้างมือคู่; โต๊ะเครื่องแป้งแบบลอย; โต๊ะเครื่องแป้งแบบตั้งอิสระ; โต๊ะเครื่องแป้งแบบแท่น; โต๊ะเครื่องแป้งแบบอ่างล้างมือเดี่ยว; โต๊ะเครื่องแป้งเปลือยด้านบน; โต๊ะเครื่องแป้งแบบมีด้านบน; ฐานโต๊ะเครื่องแป้ง
pt-PT: Mobiliário > Armários e armazenamento > Toucadores > Toucadores de casa de banho: Armários de casa de banho; Conjuntos de toucador para casa de banho; Toucadores de canto; Lavatórios duplos; Toucadores flutuantes; Toucadores independentes; Toucadores de pedestal; Toucadores de lavatório único; Toucadores descobertos; Toucadores cobertos; Bases de toucador
nl: Meubelen > Kasten en opbergmeubelen > Kaptafels > Badkamerkaptafels: Badkamerkasten; Badkamerkaptafelsets; Hoekkaptafels; Dubbele gootstenen; Zwevende kaptafels; Vrijstaande kaptafels; Kaptafels met sokkel; Kaptafels met één gootsteen; Kaptafels zonder bovenblad; Kaptafels met bovenblad; Steunen voor kaptafels
zh-TW: 家具 > 櫥櫃和收納 > 梳妝台 > 衛浴收納櫃: 浴室櫥櫃; 衛浴收納櫃組; 角落收納櫃; 雙水槽; 懸空式收納櫃; 獨立式收納櫃; 柱式洗手台; 單水槽洗手台; 無台面收納櫃; 附台面收納櫃; 洗手台底座
ro-RO: Mobilier > Dulăpioare și spații de depozitare > Măsuțe de toaletă > Mobilier pentru baie: Dulăpioare pentru baie; Seturi de mobilier pentru baie; Mobilier de colț pentru baie; Chiuvete duble; Mobilier montat pe perete pentru baie; Mobilier pentru baie de sine stătător; Măsuțe de toaletă tip piedestal; Mobilier pentru baie cu o singură chiuvetă; Mobilier pentru baie fără blat; Mobilier pentru baie cu blat; Baze mobilier pentru baie
tr: Mobilyalar > Dolaplar ve Saklama Mobilyaları > Çekmeceli Dolaplar > Lavabolu Banyo Dolapları: Banyo Dolapları; Banyo Dolap Setleri; Köşe Dolaplar; Çift Lavabo; Bağımsız Dolaplar; Serbest Duran Dolaplar; Ayaklı Dolaplar; Tek Lavabo Dolapları; Üst Olmayan Dolaplar; Üstlü Dolaplar; Dolap Tabanları
hu: Bútor > Szekrények és tárolók > Sminkasztalok > Fürdőszobai sminkasztalok: Fürdőszobaszekrények; Fürdőszobai sminkasztal-készletek; Sarok-sminkasztalok; Dupla mosdókagylók; Lebegő sminkasztalok; Szabadon álló sminkasztalok; Talapzatos sminkasztalok; Egyetlen mosdókagylós sminkasztalok; Tető nélküli sminkasztalok; Tetős sminkasztalok; Sminkasztalalapok
vi: Đồ gỗ > Tủ và đồ đựng > Bàn trang điểm > Tủ có kệ đựng bồn rửa tay: Tủ phòng tắm; Bộ bàn trang điểm phòng tắm; Bàn trang điểm đặt góc; Bồn rửa đôi; Bàn trang điểm không chân; Bàn trang điểm biệt lập; Bàn trang điểm có bệ; Bàn trang điểm có một bồn rửa; Bàn trang điểm không có mặt bàn; Bàn trang điểm có mặt bàn; Bệ bàn trang điểm
el: Έπιπλα > Ντουλάπια & αποθήκευση > Τουαλέτες (έπιπλα) > Τουαλέτες μπάνιου: Ντουλάπια μπάνιου; Σετ τουαλέτας μπάνιου; Γωνιακές τουαλέτες; Διπλοί νεροχύτες; Κρεμαστά έπιπλα μπάνιου (τουαλέτες); Ελεύθερες τουαλέτες; Τουαλέτες με βάθρο; Τουαλέτες με έναν νιπτήρα; Τουαλέτες χωρίς επιφάνεια; Τουαλέτες με επιφάνεια; Βάσεις τουαλέτας
zh-CN: 家具 > 柜子/储物 > 梳妆台 > 浴室柜: 浴室储物柜; 浴室柜套装; 转角梳妆台; 双水槽; 悬浮梳妆台; 独立式梳妆台; 座式梳妆台; 单水槽梳妆台; 无顶梳妆台; 带顶梳妆台; 梳妆台底座
pt-BR: Móveis > Armários e armazenamento > Armários > Armários para banheiro: Gabinetes de banheiro; Conjuntos de gabinete para banheiro; Gabinetes de canto; Pias duplas; Gabinetes flutuantes; Gabinetes independentes; Gabinetes com pedestal; Gabinetes de pia única; Penteadeiras sem tampo; Penteadeiras com tampo; Bases de gabinete
hr-HR: Namještaj > Elementi i pohrana > Elementi za umivaonik > Kupaonski elementi za umivaonik: Kupaonski elementi; Kompleti kupaonskih elemenata za umivaonik; Kutni elementi za umivaonik; Dvostruki umivaonici; Zidni elementi za umivaonik; Samostojeći elementi za umivaonik; Elementi za umivaonik s postoljem; Elementi za jedan umivaonik; Elementi za umivaonik bez gornje ploče; Elementi za umivaonik s gornjom pločom; Osnove elemenata za umivaonik
ru: Мебель > Шкафы и мебель для хранения > Туалетные столики, тумбы и шкафчики > Тумбы и шкафчики для ванной комнаты: Шкафчики для ванной комнаты; Мебельные гарнитуры для ванной комнаты; Угловые тумбы; Тумбы для двух раковин; Подвесные тумбы; Напольные тумбы; Тумбы для раковин с пьедесталом; Тумбы для одной раковины; Тумбы без столешниц; Тумбы со столешницами; Подставки для раковины
sk-SK: Nábytok > Úložné skrinky > Toaletné stolíky > Kúpeľňové skrinky pod umývadlo: Kúpeľňové skrinky; Súpravy kúpeľňových skriniek; Rohové kúpeľňové skrinky; Dvojité umývadlá; Závesné kúpeľňové skrinky; Voľne stojace kúpeľňové skrinky; Kúpeľňové skrinky na podstavci; Kúpeľňové skrinky s jedným umývadlom; Kúpeľňové skrinky bez dosky; Kúpeľňové skrinky s doskou; Kúpeľňové skrinky
da: Møbler > Skabe og opbevaring > Små pynteborde > Badeværelsesborde: Badeværelsesskabe; Badeværelsesbordsæt; Hjørneborde; Dobbelt håndvask; Flydende borde; Fritstående borde; Piedestal-borde; Borde med enkelt håndvask; Topfri borde; Topborde; Bordbaser
en: Furniture > Cabinets & Storage > Vanities > Bathroom Vanities: Bathroom Cabinets; Bathroom Vanity Sets; Corner Vanities; Double Sinks; Floating Vanities; Free-Standing Vanities; Pedestal Vanities; Single Sink Vanities; Topless Vanities; Topped Vanities; Vanity Bases
pl: Meble > Szafy i przechowywanie > Toaletki > Toaletki do łazienki: Szafki łazienkowe; Zestawy toaletek łazienkowych; Toaletki narożne; Podwójne umywalki; Toaletki wiszące; Toaletki wolnostojące; Toaletki na cokole; Toaletki z pojedynczą umywalką; Toaletki bezblatowe; Toaletki z blatem; Podstawy toaletek
sl-SI: Pohištvo > Omare in shranjevanje > Mizice za ličenje > Kopalniške omarice: Kopalniške omarice; Kompleti kopalniških toaletnih mizic; Kotne kopalniške omarice; Dvojni umivalniki; Viseče kopalniške omarice; Samostoječe kopalniške omarice; Dvignjene kopalniške omarice; Toaletne mizice z enojnim umivalnikom; Kopalniške omarice brez umivalnika; Kopalniške omarice z umivalnikom; Podnožja za toaletne mizice
ko: 가구 > 캐비닛/수납장 > 배니티 > 욕실 화장대: 욕실장; 욕실 화장대 세트; 코너형 욕실 화장대; 싱크 2개 세면대; 벽부착형 욕실 화장대; 스탠드형 욕실 화장대; 기둥 받침형 욕실 화장대; 싱크 1개 세면대; 상판이 없는 욕실 화장대; 상판이 있는 욕실 화장대; 세면대 하부장
de: Möbel > Schränke > Wasch- und Schminktische > Badezimmerwaschtische: Badezimmerschränke; Badezimmer-Wasch- und Schminktisch-Sets; Eck-Waschtische; Doppelwaschbecken; Schwebende Waschtische; Freistehende Waschtische; Sockel-Waschtische; Einzel-Waschtische; Waschtische ohne Abstellfläche; Waschtische mit Abstellfläche; Waschtischsockel
ja: 家具 > 収納家具 > 化粧台・鏡台 > 洗面化粧台: バスルームキャビネット; バスルーム洗面化粧台セット; コーナー洗面化粧台; ダブルシンク; フローティング洗面化粧台; 自立型洗面化粧台; 台座洗面化粧台; シングルシンクの洗面化粧台; 埋め込みタイプ; 上乗せタイプ; 洗面化粧台ベース
es: Mobiliario > Armarios y almacenamiento > Tocadores > Tocadores de baño: Armarios de baño; Juegos de tocador para baño; Tocadores de esquina; Lavabos dobles; Tocadores flotantes; Tocadores independientes; Tocadores de pedestal; Tocadores con lavabo individual; Tocadores sin encimera; Tocadores con encimera; Bases de tocador